Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1
COLORADO STATE PATROL

43-5-101 to 43-5-128. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part repealed, p. 971, § 28, effective July 1, 1984.

Editor's note:

This part 1 was numbered as article 10 of chapter 120, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments prior to its repeal in 1984, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the Colorado state patrol from the state department of highways to the department of public safety on July 1, 1984, see § 24-1-128.6; for the substantive provisions relating to the Colorado state patrol, see part 2 of article 33.5 of title 24.